Utah statutes.
48-2a-1104.   Effective date -- Extended effective date -- Applicability of former law.

Except as set forth below, the effective date of this chapter is July 1, 1990.

(1)  The existing provisions for execution and filing of certificates of limited partnerships continue in effect with respect to limited partnerships organized prior to the effective date of this chapter until January 1, 1991, the extended effective date, and Sections 48-2a-102, 48-2a-105, 48-2a-201, and 48-2a-210 are not effective with respect to such preexisting limited partnerships until January 1, 1991, the extended effective date.

(2)  Sections 48-2a-210, 48-2a-901, 48-2a-902, 48-2a-903, 48-2a-904, 48-2a-905, 48-2a-906, 48-2a-907, and 48-2a-908, governing the registration of foreign limited partnerships are not effective until January 1, 1991, the extended effective date.

(3)  Sections 48-2a-501, 48-2a-502, and 48-2a-608 apply only to contributions and distributions made after July 1, 1990, and  Subsection 48-2a-102(1)(a) applies only to limited partnerships formed or qualified after July 1, 1990.

(4)  Section 48-2a-704 applies only to assignments made after July 1, 1990.

(5)  Unless otherwise agreed by the partners, the applicable provisions of existing law governing allocation of profits and losses, rather than the provisions of Section 48-2a-503, sharing of distributions, rather than the provisions of Section 48-2a-504, interim distributions, rather than the provisions of Section 48-2a-601, distributions to a withdrawing partner, rather than the provisions of Section 48-2a-604, and distributions of assets upon the winding up of a limited partnership, rather than the provisions of Section 48-2a-804, govern limited partnerships formed before July 1, 1990.

(6)  The county clerk in each county in this state shall transmit to the division by January 1, 1991, all certificates of limited partnership and certificates of amendment filed with them prior to July 1, 1990, by domestic limited partnerships whose existence has not terminated prior to July 1, 1990.



Amended by Chapter 5, 1991 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 189, 1991 General Session

